New Jersey, session 222, S880.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The following items in section 1 of P.L.2022, c.49, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2023, are amended to read as follows: 22 DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 55 Social Services Programs GRANTS-IN-AID 05-8050  Community Resources.......... [$166,571,000] $155,021,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Social Services Program .. [$166,571,000] $155,021,000 Grants-in-Aid: [05          Newark Museum................................................. ($5,700,000) 05            Camden County Historical Society ....................... (250,000) 05            Lambert Castle Visiting Center .......................... (3,600,000) 05            Collingswood Foundation for the Arts  Collingswood Grand Ballroom ......................................................................... (2,000,000)] 74 DEPARTMENT OF STATE 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 37 Cultural and Intellectual Development Services GRANTS-IN-AID 05-2530  Support of the Arts.................... [$40,375,000] $53,925,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Cultural and Intellectual Development Services ................................ [$47,878,000] $61,428,000 Grants-in-Aid: [05   Newark Symphony Hall Infrastructure Project ($6,000,000) 05     Capital Philharmonic of New Jersey.............. ($175,000) 05     The Papermill Playhouse  Capital Improvements ($2,000,000)] 05     Arts, Cultural, and Historic Organizations Fund . $21,725,000 The amount hereinabove appropriated for Arts, Cultural, and Historic Organizations Fund shall be used to establish a competitive grant program in the Department of State that provides funds to support the missions and financial and capital needs of qualifying arts, cultural, and historic organizations. The Secretary of State shall establish reasonable eligibility criteria, and identify any priority funding areas, for the distribution of grants under the program, provided however that, to the maximum extent possible, funds awarded under the grant program shall be allocated equally among the northern, central, and southern regions of the State. 94 INTERDEPARTMENTAL ACCOUNTS 70 Government Direction, Management, and Control 74 General Government Services GRANTS-IN-AID 09-9460  Aid to Independent Authorities [$148,934,000] $146,934,000 (From General Fund  ....................... [$134,657,000] $132,457,000 ) Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, General Government Services       [$148,934,000] $146,934,000 Grants-in-Aid: [09   New Jersey Performing Arts Center-Operating Aid ($2,000,000)] FEDERAL FUNDS Notwithstanding the provisions of any law or regulation to the contrary, moneys are appropriated from the federal Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund (SFRF) established pursuant to the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, Pub. L. 117-2, in the following amounts for the following purposes without the additional approval by the Joint Budget Oversight Committee: Program Agency Appropriation TOTAL $1,763,447,000 Rutgers University  Capital Needs State $300,000,000 Water Infrastructure DEP 300,000,000 Home Lead Paint Remediation DCA 170,000,000 UPK Facilities Fund (SDA) DOE 120,000,000 Rebuild by Design Hoboken DEP 100,000,000 Liberty State Park IDA 50,000,000 Capital Improvements, Statewide IDA 50,000,000 Enrollment Based Payment Extension DHS 48,000,000 Resident Services Upgrades OIT 40,000,000 Railroad and Bus Operations (NJ Transit Improvements) DOT 40,000,000 Overlook Medical Center  Emergency Department Renovation DOH 35,000,000 Child Care Facilities Fund EDA 30,000,000 Real Estate Projects Fund  Property Assemblage EDA 30,000,000 Revolutionary War State Owned Historic Sites Treasury 25,000,000 Greenway Planning, Development, and Remediation DEP 20,000,000 Maternal and Infant Health Center Capital EDA 20,000,000 Middlesex County College Treasury 20,000,000 Middlesex County Improvement Authority DCA 20,000,000 Union County Improvement Authority DCA 20,000,000 Kean University Science Buildings State 20,000,000 Arts Support and Placemaking EDA 15,000,000 Unemployment Processing Modernization and Improvements DOL 15,000,000 IHE Mental Health Provider Grants OSHE 15,000,000 State Building Electrification Pilot Treasury 10,000,000 Increased County Jail Population due to COVID DOC 10,000,000 RWJ Barnabas Health  Mobile Health Division DOH 10,000,000 Gap Financing  Real Estate Projects Funding EDA 10,000,000 Telehealth Mental Health Supports OSHE 10,000,000 Resident Services Upgrades MVC 9,000,000 Capital Health  Satellite Emergency Department, Trenton DOH 8,000,000 Paulsboro Port Road Paving DOT 8,000,000 Virtua Health  Hospital Infrastructure and Workforce Education DOH 8,000,000 Ferry Terminal Support  Carteret NJT 8,000,000 Ferry Terminal Support  South Amboy NJT 8,000,000 Irvington Park DCA 7,500,000 Neighborhood Revitalization Tax Credit DCA 7,500,000 School Linked Services Federal Revenue Planning DCF 6,500,000 Newark Pedestrianization DCA 6,500,000 Universal Newborn Home Visitation DCF 6,000,000 Office of Eviction Prevention DCA 5,500,000 Assertive Community Treatment Pilot DCF 5,000,000 [New Jersey Performing Arts Center  Community Center] Arts, Cultural, and Historic Organizations Fund [IDA] State 5,000,000 Centralized Advertising Budget DHS 5,000,000 South Toms River Landfill DEP 5,000,000 Elizabeth, Storm Recovery Support DCA 5,000,000 Atlantic County Airport DCA 5,000,000 Stormwater Drainage Repair & Replacement  NJ State Prison DOC 5,000,000 Inspira Health  Hospital Infrastructure and Workforce Education DOH 5,000,000 Cooper University Hospital  Ronald McDonald House Southern New Jersey DOH 5,000,000 Carrier Clinic  Inpatient Behavioral Health Expansion DOH 5,000,000 St. Peters Hospital  Family Health Center DOH 5,000,000 Coriell Institute for Medical Research  New Research Facility DOH 5,000,000 Rowan University-Rutgers Camden Board of Governors State 5,000,000 The New Valley Hospital  Pandemic and Emergency Preparedness DOH 5,000,000 COVID Respite Services DCF 4,300,000 County Area Agencies on Aging DHS 4,000,000 Port Liberte Ferry Terminal NJT 4,000,000 Developing Resiliency with Engaging Approaches to Maximize Success (DREAMS) DOE 3,600,000 Educator and Staff Training Initiatives DOE 3,300,000 Hudson County Jail DOC 3,200,000 Worker Experience & Service Delivery OOI 3,200,000 Veterans Haven North HVAC System MVA 2,930,000 Teen Mental Health First Aid Pilot DHS 2,700,000 Neighborhood Preservation Program DCA 2,500,000 Potable Water Treatment Improvements  New Lisbon/Hunterdon DHS 2,417,000 Higher Education Peer Counseling DHS 2,400,000 State Police  Storage Warehouses LPS 2,200,000 Manufacturing Initiative  Workforce Development DOL 2,000,000 CareWell Health  Drug and Alcohol Rehabilitation Facility DCA 2,000,000 United in Care DCA 1,500,000 Mental Health First Aid DHS 1,500,000 Society for Prevention of Teen Suicide DCF 1,200,000 Employer Supports CC&R Agency Support DHS 1,000,000 IHE MH Professional Development OSHE 1,000,000 Former State Buildings Planning Study Treasury 1,000,000 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.